Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Assessments for Promotion of Dairy Industry

247.450.
Promotion of milk production and use in public interest.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that Kentucky farmers who are producers of milk and milk products, shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with all producers, handlers, dealers and processors of such products in promoting and stimulating, by advertising, research and other methods, the increased production, use and sale, domestic and foreign, of any and all of such agricultural commodities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 1.

247.453.
Definitions for KRS 247.450 to 247.505.

As used in KRS

247.450

to

247.505

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Board” means the state board of agriculture;

“Producer” means every person who produces milk or cream from cows and thereafter causes the same to be marketed as milk, cream or other dairy products;

“New producer” means a producer who was not engaged in the business of producing milk at the time a referendum was conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative or other business entity;

“Milk” means milk from cows and all of its natural components, sweet cream, sour cream, skim milk, flavored milk, buttermilk, condensed or concentrated whole or skim milk for use in milk products of every kind and description;

“Handler” or “dealer” means any person, including any distributor, processor, bulk milk handler, or operator of a store, who purchases or receives on consignment or otherwise, milk and milk products of every kind and description, within the state, for sale, shipment, storage, processing, or manufacture;

“Processor” means any person engaged in the business of processing milk and other material into milk products of every kind and description.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 2.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1988). A technical correction has been made in this section by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to
KRS

7.136

.

247.457.
Association of producers not illegal.

No association meeting or activity undertaken in pursuance of the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

and intended to benefit all of the producers, handlers and processors of such agricultural commodity shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 3.

247.460.
Producers may by referendum impose assessment on product.

It is hereby further declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the state that producers of milk and milk products on a commercial basis shall be permitted by referendum to be held among such respective groups and subject to the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

, to levy upon themselves an assessment on such commodity and provide for the collection of the same, for the purpose of financing or contributing towards the financing of a program of promoting, advertising, researching and other methods designed to increase the consumption, use and sale of, and the domestic as well as foreign markets for, such agricultural commodity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 4.

247.463.
Application by association for assessment — Form.

Any existing commission, council, board, association or other agency such as the American Dairy Association of Kentucky, fairly representative of the producers of such agricultural commodity herein referred to may at any time after the enactment of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

make application to the State Board of Agriculture on forms prescribed by such board for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among the producers of such agricultural commodity, for commercial purposes, upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

, collecting and utilizing the same for the purpose stated in such referendum. Such application forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Applicant’s name;

Applicant’s address;

Date;

Program to be undertaken for producers;

Brief statement of how program is to be implemented;

Referendum to be conducted on a statewide or area basis;

Proposed effective date of program;

Geographic area (by counties) of producers to be affected by program;

Signature of applicant.

Upon receipt of such application, the commissioner shall publish such application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 5.

247.467.
State Board of Agriculture on approval of application to certify association to hold referendum.

Upon the filing with the State Board of Agriculture of such application on the part of any commission, council, board, association, or other agency of producers, the Commissioner shall within thirty (30) days thereafter convene the State Board of Agriculture to consider such application; and if upon such consideration the said board of agriculture shall find that the commission, council, board or other agency making such application is fairly representative of and has been duly chosen and delegated as representative of the producers producing such commodity, and shall otherwise find and determine that such application is in conformity with the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

and the purposes therein stated, then and in such an event it shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Agriculture to certify such commission, council, board, association or other agency as the duly delegated and authorized group or agency representative of the producers of such agricultural commodity, and shall likewise certify that such agency is duly authorized to conduct among the producers of such commodity a referendum for the purpose herein stated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 6.

247.470.
Certified association may hold referendum — Scope.

Upon being so certified by the said Commissioner of Agriculture in the manner hereinbefore set forth, such commission, council, board or other agency shall thereupon be fully authorized and empowered to hold and conduct on the part of the producers of such agricultural commodity a referendum on the question of whether or not such producers shall levy upon themselves an assessment under and subject to and for the purpose stated in KRS

247.450

to

247.505

. Such referendum may be conducted either on a statewide or area basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 7.

247.473.
Referendum on area or statewide basis — Who may participate.

Any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

may be held either on an area or statewide basis, as may be determined by the certified agency before such referendum is called; and such referendum, on an area or statewide basis may be participated in by all producers engaged in the production of such agricultural commodity on a commercial basis, including owners of farms on which such commodity is produced, tenants and sharecroppers sharing in the proceeds of such commodity. In such referendum, such individuals so eligible for participation shall vote upon the question of whether or not there shall be levied an annual assessment in the amount set forth in the call for such referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 10.

247.477.
Commissioner to supervise referendum — Expenses.

The manner, conduct, and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

shall be under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Agriculture, and any and all expenses in connection therewith shall be borne by commission, council, board or other agency certified in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 9.

247.480.
Commissioner of Agriculture to determine polling places, details of assessment, limits.

With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall, before calling and announcing such referendum, fix, determine and publicly announce at least thirty (30) days before the date determined upon for such referendum, the date, hours and polling places for voting in such referendum, the effective date of the assessment, if adopted, the amount and basis of the assessment proposed to be collected, the means by which such assessment shall be collected if authorized by the producers, and the general purposes to which said amount so collected shall be applied; no annual assessment levied under the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

shall exceed one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the value of the year’s production of such agricultural commodity produced by any producer included in the group to which such referendum is submitted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 8.

247.483.
Rules governing holding of referendum prescribed by Commissioner — Notice — Limit on assessment.

The hours, voting places, rules and regulations and the area within which such referendum herein authorized with respect to such agricultural commodity herein referred to shall be established and determined by the Commissioner of Agriculture; the said referendum date, area, hours, voting places, rules and regulations with respect to the holding of such referendum shall be published by the Commissioner conducting the same through the medium of the public press in the Commonwealth of Kentucky at least thirty (30) days before the holding of such referendum, and direct written notice thereof shall likewise be given to each county or area agent, in any county in which such agricultural product is produced. Such notice shall likewise contain a statement of the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied, which assessment in any event shall not exceed one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the value of the year’s production of such agricultural commodity grown by the producer included in the group to which such referendum is submitted, and shall likewise state the method by which such assessment shall be collected and how the proceeds thereof shall be administered and the purposes to which the same shall be applied, which purposes shall be in keeping with the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 12.

247.487.
Commissioner to prepare question — Canvass of vote.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall likewise prepare and distribute in advance of such referendum the question to be presented to the voters, and shall arrange for the necessary poll holders for conducting the said referendum; and following such referendum and within ten (10) days thereafter the said Commissioner shall canvass and publicly declare the result of such referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 13; 1982, ch. 360, § 70, effective July 15, 1982.

247.490.
Affirmative vote, effect — Domestic and foreign associations.

If, in such referendum called under the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

, a majority of the producers in the area in which such referendum is conducted, eligible to participate and voting therein, shall vote in the affirmative and in favor of the levying and collection of such assessment proposed in such referendum on such agricultural commodity, then such assessment shall be collected in the manner determined and announced by the agency conducting such referendum.

Any agricultural cooperative association organized under KRS Chapter 272 or 272A, any foreign agricultural cooperative association, or any foreign limited cooperative association that has received a certificate of authority to conduct business in the Commonwealth in the same manner as a domestic agricultural cooperative association, on application to and approval by the Commissioner, may by an alternate procedure, not in conflict with the purposes of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

, handle the collection and disbursement of the assessments of its members. The purchaser of the agricultural commodity of the members of such association shall be relieved of the collecting and reporting requirements of KRS

247.493

with respect to such members.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 11; 1974, ch. 401, § 1; 2012, ch. 160, § 137, effective July 12, 2012.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The method for collecting and handling the assessment fund of Dairymen Incorporated is not in violation of this section since the 1974 amendment to this section permitting the qualifying association to collect and disburse the assessments of its members by alternate procedure would take precedence over the collecting method in KRS

247.493

.

OAG 74-908

.

The books and records of collections and disbursements of the qualifying association would be open to inspection by the department of agriculture under this section to the same extent as those of purchasers under KRS

247.493

.

OAG 74-908

.

247.493.
On approval, notice to be given milk purchasers as to deduction required — Disposition of collections.

In the event a majority of the producers eligible for participation in such referendum and voting therein shall vote in favor of such assessment, then, upon the written request of the duly certified commission, council, board, association or other agency of producers of such agricultural commodity, the Commissioner shall notify forthwith, by certified mail, all persons engaged in the business of purchasing such agricultural commodities in this state, that on and after the date specified in such letter, the specified assessment shall be deducted from the producer’s payment by the purchaser, or his agent or representative, from the purchase price of such agricultural commodity. The assessment so deducted shall, on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the month in which such commodity is sold to the purchaser, be remitted by such purchaser to the duly certified commission, council, board, association or other agency of the producers entitled thereto. Such funds, including donations from individuals, concerns, corporations and grants from the state or governmental agencies, shall be used for the purpose of promoting and stimulating, by advertising, research and other methods, the increased use and sale, domestic and foreign, of such agricultural commodity. The books and records of all such purchasers of such agricultural commodity shall at all times during regular business hours be open for inspection by the Commissioner of Agriculture or his duly authorized agents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 14; 1980, ch. 114, § 45, effective July 15, 1980.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The American Dairy Association of Kentucky is required to physically receive the funds representing the assessment that is required to be remitted to it by the purchaser of dairy products.

OAG 71-489

.

The method of collecting and handling the assessment fund of Dairymen Incorporated is not in violation of KRS

247.490

since the 1974 amendment to that section permitting the qualifying association to collect and disburse the assessments of its members by alternate procedure would take precedence over the collecting method in this section.

OAG 74-908

.

The books and records of collections and disbursements of the qualifying association would be open to inspection by the department of agriculture under KRS

247.490

to the same extent as those of purchasers under this section.

OAG 74-908

.

247.497.
Producer may obtain refund of amount collected from him.

In the event such referendum is carried in the affirmative and the assessment is levied and collected as provided herein, any producer upon and against whom such assessment shall have been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

, if dissatisfied with said assessment and the result thereof, shall have the right to demand of and receive from the treasurer of said certified commission, council, board, association or other agency of producers a refund of such assessment so collected from such producer, provided such demand for refund is made in writing within thirty (30) days from the date on which said assessment is collected from producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 15.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Capper-Volstead Act, 7 USCS §§ 291, 292, contains no provision that in any way affects or inhibits the provisions of the dairy promotion law, particularly the refund provisions of this section.

OAG 72-150

.

247.500.
Annual review of program — Referendum requirement — Termination.

The board shall review the assessment program annually. If, at the end of each year after the first year of the assessment program, the board determines that the producers in the referendum area representing fifty percent (50%) of the production of milk are not participating in the program, the commissioner shall then conduct a referendum among the producers in such area. If, upon such referendum, a majority of the producers in such area reject such program, it shall be terminated as at the end of the month in which such referendum for such area was conducted and held; otherwise such assessment program shall continue in force and effect.

If the certified commission, council, board, association, or other agency of producers expresses in writing its desire to the commissioner to discontinue the assessment program and terminate the same, the commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days following receipt of such request convene the board to review and act on such request. The board, after reviewing such request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary in connection with such request, may terminate such program effective at the end of the month in which such board action is taken; and in this event the commissioner shall notify, by certified mail, the purchasers of such agricultural commodity of the termination of such program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 16; 1970, ch. 92, § 77; 1980, ch. 114, § 46, effective July 15, 1980.

247.505.
Injunction against violations — Penalties.

Whenever in the judgment of the board or the certified commission, council, board, association or other agency of producers, a purchaser has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the sections of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

, the board or the certified commission, council, board, association or other agency of producers may make application to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining such act or acts or practices and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against such purchaser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 17 (1).